Washington statutes.
RCW 26.14.140

Award.

(1) An arbitrator shall make an award in a record, dated and signed by the arbitrator. The arbitrator shall give notice of the award to each party by a method agreed on by the parties or, if the parties have not agreed on a method, under the law and procedural rules of this state other than this chapter governing notice in contractual arbitration.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, the award under this chapter must state the reasons on which it is based unless otherwise agreed by the parties.

(3) An award determining a child-related dispute must state the reasons on which it is based as required by law of this state other than this chapter for a court order in a family law proceeding.

(4) An award under this chapter is not enforceable as a judgment until confirmed under RCW 26.14.150.

[ 2023 c 61 s 15.]